Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB670.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 5.204 is amended to read as follows:
The Fourth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:
County: Lyon[Hopkins] KY
County: Marshall KY
County: McCracken KY (part)
A110 – Clarks River #2
A117 – Oaks Station
A118 – Florence Station
Section 2. KRS 5.206 is amended to read as follows:
The Sixth Representative District shall consist of the following territory:
County: Hopkins[Lyon] KY
[County: Marshall KY
County: McCracken KY (part)
A110 - Clarks River #2
A117 - Oaks Station
A118 - Florence Station]
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:44 PM Jacketed